Utah statutes.
59-12-801.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Emergency medical services" is as defined in Section 26-8a-102.

(2)  "Federally qualified health center" is as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395x.

(3)  "Freestanding urgent care center" means a facility that provides outpatient health care service:

(a)  on an as-needed basis, without an appointment;

(b)  to the public;

(c)  for the diagnosis and treatment of a medical condition if that medical condition does not require hospitalization or emergency intervention for a life threatening or potentially permanently disabling condition; and

(d)  including one or more of the following services:

(i)  a medical history physical examination;

(ii)  an assessment of health status; or

(iii)  treatment:

(A)  for a variety of medical conditions; and

(B)  that is commonly offered in a physician's office.

(4)  "Nursing care facility" is as defined in Section 26-21-2.

(5)  "Rural city hospital" means a hospital owned by a city that is located within a third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class county.

(6)  "Rural county health care facility" means a:

(a)  rural county hospital; or

(b)   rural county nursing care facility.

(7)  "Rural county hospital" means a hospital owned by a county that is:

(a)  a third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class county, as defined in Section 17-50-501; and

(b)  located outside of a standard metropolitan statistical area, as designated by the United States Bureau of the Census.

(8)  "Rural county nursing care facility" means a nursing care facility owned by a county that is:

(a)  a third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class county, as defined in Section 17-50-501; and

(b)  located outside of a standard metropolitan statistical area, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.

(9)  "Rural emergency medical services" means emergency medical services that are provided by a county that is:

(a)  a third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class county, as defined in Section 17-50-501; and

(b)  located outside of a standard metropolitan statistical area, as designated by the United States Census Bureau.

(10)  "Rural health clinic" is as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395x.



Amended by Chapter 302, 2006 General Session

